Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TASK FORCE ON MANDATORY MINIMUM SENTENCES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "mandatory minimum" refers to legislatively defined, predetermined sentencing requirements, including but not limited to sentencing requirements under Minnesota Statutes, sections 152.021, 152.022, and 609.11, that mandate a minimum period of commitment to the commissioner of corrections upon conviction for certain offenses. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Mandatory Minimum Sentences is established to collect and analyze data on the charging, convicting, and sentencing of persons to mandatory minimum sentences; assess whether current laws and practices promote public safety and equity in sentencing; and make recommendations to the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of corrections, or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the executive director of the Minnesota Sentencing Guidelines Commission, or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) the state public defender, or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) the statewide coordinator of the Violent Crime Coordinating Council, or a designee; new text end new text begin (5) one defense attorney, appointed by the Minnesota Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers; new text end new text begin (6) two county attorneys, one from Hennepin or Ramsey County and one from outside the seven-county metropolitan area, appointed by the Minnesota County Attorneys Association; new text end new text begin (7) a peace officer familiar with shooting investigations, appointed by the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association; new text end new text begin (8) a peace officer familiar with shooting investigations, appointed by the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association; new text end new text begin (9) one member representing a victims' rights organization, appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (10) one member of a statewide civil rights organization, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; new text end new text begin (11) one impacted person who is directly related to a person who has been convicted of a mandatory minimum sentence or who has themselves been convicted of a mandatory minimum sentence and has completed the sentence, appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (12) one person with academic expertise regarding the laws and practices of other states relating to mandatory minimum sentences, appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than July 30, 2025. new text end new text begin (c) Members shall serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair and may elect other officers as necessary. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of corrections shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 1, 2025, and shall provide meeting space and administrative assistance as necessary for the task force to conduct its work. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet at least monthly or upon the call of its chair. The task force shall meet sufficiently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin (d) To compile and analyze data, the task force shall request the cooperation and assistance of local law enforcement agencies, the Minnesota Sentencing Guidelines Commission, the judicial branch, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, county attorneys, and Tribal governments and may request the cooperation of academics and others with experience and expertise in researching the impact of mandatory minimum sentences. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force shall, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) collect and analyze data on charges, convictions, and sentences that involve mandatory minimum sentences; new text end new text begin (2) collect and analyze data on mandatory minimum sentences in which a person received a mitigated durational departure because the mandatory minimum sentence was seen as inappropriate by a judge or county attorney, or both; new text end new text begin (3) collect and analyze data on mandatory minimum sentences in which a person likely would have received a mitigated durational departure but for the enforcement of a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (4) collect and analyze data on charges, convictions, and sentences for codefendants of persons sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (5) review relevant state statutes and state and federal court decisions; new text end new text begin (6) receive input from persons who were convicted of a crime with a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (7) receive input from family members of persons who were convicted of a crime with a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (8) receive input from persons who were victims of crimes with a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (9) receive input from family members of persons who were victims of crimes with a mandatory minimum sentence; new text end new text begin (10) analyze the benefits and unintended consequences of state statutes and practices related to the charging, convicting, and sentencing of persons of crimes with mandatory minimum sentences, including but not limited to an analysis of whether current statutes and practices: new text end new text begin (i) promote public safety; and new text end new text begin (ii) properly punish a person for that person's role in an offense; and new text end new text begin (11) make recommendations for legislative action, if any, on laws affecting: new text end new text begin (i) the collection and reporting of data; and new text end new text begin (ii) the charging, convicting, and sentencing of persons for crimes with mandatory minimum sentences. new text end new text begin (b) At its discretion, the task force may examine, as necessary, other related issues consistent with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin On or before August 15, 2026, the task force shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over criminal sentencing on the findings and recommendations of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its report under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end